District of Columbia statutes.
1-613.52

Performance management system.

The performance management system shall provide for:

(1)

The development of individual performance plans for all employees;

(2)

Ratings based on one or more of the following performance management components:

(A)

Standards;

(B)

Objectives;

(C)

Real-time tasks and assignments; and

(D)

Competencies;

(3)

Up to 5 rating levels, the highest of which shall constitute an outstanding performance rating for purposes of § 1-624.02(b)(3) and the lowest of which shall constitute an unacceptable performance rating for purposes of § 1-624.02(b)(4);

(4)

A rating process, with (at a minimum) annual evaluations which may include input from citizens, customers, peers, the employee, subordinates, and supervisors;

(5)

A removal and reconsideration process, which may include the alternatives of reassignment and demotion; and

(6)

An opportunity to demonstrate an improvement in performance during the reconsideration process.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1352
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(p), 45 DCR 2464
June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-131, § 2(b), 47 DCR 2692
This section is referenced in § 1-613.51.
1981 Ed., § 1-614.52.
D.C. Law 13-131 rewrote subd. (3), which previously read:
“Rating levels of:
“(A) Exceeds expectations (outstanding);
“(B) Achieved expectations;
“(C) Below expectations; and
“(D) Failed expectations (unacceptable);”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Performance Rating Levels Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-85, April 12, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 2642).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Performance Rating Levels Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-206, December 8, 1999, 46 DCR 10468).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Performance Rating Levels Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-275, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2013).
Applicability of § 101(p) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-613.51.